Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-11,105
Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund is created. The fund shall be established within the Department of Administrative Services and administered by the Chief Information Officer. The fund shall consist of retainer-fee revenue received from state agencies accessing the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System, as authorized by the Legislature through the budget process. The fund shall only be used to pay for centralized direct costs of administering, operating, and maintaining the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System, including state-owned towers and network equipment. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2007, LB322, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.